Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.21
Commercial hazardous waste management facility; permittee; financial responsibility and insurance.

As a condition of granting a permit for any commercial hazardous waste management facility, the permittee shall provide proof of financial responsibility pursuant to subdivision (21)(a) of section 81-1505 and liability insurance, including coverage against nonsudden and accidental occurrences, in an amount determined by the director.

Laws 1980, LB 853, § 11;

Laws 1984, LB 1078, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 81-1521.04;

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 15.